Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1329
Limitation of actions.

Every claim and demand under the State Employees Retirement Act and against the retirement system or the retirement board shall be forever barred unless the action is brought within two years of the time at which the claim accrued.

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 42.